Wyoming, session 2025, HB0257.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-7-113 is created to read:

33-7-113. Barber apprenticeship; requirements.

(a) A registered barber may select persons to
participate in the barber's barbershop as apprentices. A
registered barber shall have not more than two (2)
apprentices at any one (1) time. At the end of an
HB0257

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0649
apprenticeship under this section, an apprentice shall be
qualified to receive a certificate to practice as a
registered barber if all of the following are met:

(i) The apprenticeship shall occur in a licensed
barbershop approved by the board and under a registered
barber with a certificate as required under this chapter;

(ii) The apprenticeship shall include not less
than thirty-six (36) hours of training in safety,
sanitation, sterilization, aseptic and other practices
necessary to prevent the spread of infectious and
contagious diseases;

(iii) The apprenticeship shall be completed in
not less than one (1) year and not more than two (2) years.
The minimum period of an apprenticeship required to qualify
an apprentice for a certificate to practice as a registered
barber is one thousand six hundred (1,600) hours;

(iv) An apprentice shall have a high school
diploma or equivalent and be authorized to work in the
United States;
HB0257

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0649

(v) An apprentice shall pay an apprenticeship
registration fee in an amount established and collected by
the board;

(vi) The supervising barber shall certify to the
board that the apprentice has completed all required
training;

(vii) An apprentice shall pass an examination as
required by W.S. 33-7-209 and meet all requirements set
forth by board rule and regulation that the board deems
necessary to be certified as a registered barber.

(b) An apprentice shall be prohibited from practicing
barbering on customers unless:

(i) The apprentice has completed a set number of
hours of the apprenticeship as specified by the board which
hours shall be sufficient to assure basic competency in the
practice of barbering;

HB0257

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0649
(ii) The apprentice has completed thirty-six
(36) hours of training in safety, sanitation,
sterilization, aseptic and other practices necessary to
prevent transmission of infectious and contagious diseases;
and

(iii) The apprentice has completed a written
examination prepared or approved by the board on sanitary
practices.

Section 2. W.S. 33-7-101(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vii) and by renumbering paragraph (vii) as
(viii), 33-7-204(a)(intro) and by creating a new paragraph
(viii) and 33-7-209(a)(ii), (iii) and by creating a new
paragraph (iv) are amended to read:

33-7-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(vii) "Apprentice" means a person who has been
selected by a barber to engage in on-site training to
HB0257

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0649
acquire a certificate to practice as a registered barber
pursuant to W.S. 33-7-113;

(vii)(viii) "This act" means W.S. 33-7-101
through 33-7-211.

33-7-204. Fees.

(a) The board shall establish and collect fees
pursuant to W.S. 33-1-201 for the certificates, licenses,
permits, registrations and examinations indicated:

(viii) Apprenticeship registration.

33-7-209. Qualifications for registration as barber;
examination.

(a) A certificate of registration to practice
barbering shall be issued upon passage of a board
administered or board approved examination, and upon
meeting all requirements set forth by board rule and
regulation, to any person who files a completed
HB0257

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0649
application, accompanied by the required fees and
documentation and who:

(ii) Has a valid, unexpired license as a barber
from another state or country which has licensing
requirements for barbers that meet or exceed the
requirements for certification in Wyoming; or

(iii) Is a cosmetologist or hair stylist
licensed under W.S. 33-12-119 through 33-12-140, has
completed training at an approved barber school or college
as set forth in board rules and regulations and passed an
examination conducted by the board to determine his fitness
for practice;. or

(iv) Completes an apprenticeship under W.S.
33-7-113 and is not less than seventeen (17) years of age.

Section 3. The board of barber examiners shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act.

HB0257

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0649
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon the completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0257